Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-326
Discriminatory housing practice; complaint; procedure; investigation.

(1)(a)(i) An aggrieved person may, not later than one year after an alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated, file a complaint with the commission alleging such discriminatory housing practice. The commission, on its own initiative, may also file such a complaint.

(ii) The complaint shall be in writing and shall contain such information and be in such form as the commission requires.

(iii) The commission may also investigate housing practices to determine whether a complaint should be brought under this section.

(b) Upon the filing of a complaint:

(i) The commission shall serve notice upon the aggrieved person acknowledging such filing and advising the aggrieved person of the time limits and choice of forums provided under the Nebraska Fair Housing Act;

(ii) The commission shall, not later than ten days after such filing or the identification of an additional respondent under subsection (2) of this section, serve on the respondent a notice identifying the alleged discriminatory housing practice and advising such respondent of the procedural rights and obligations of respondents under the act, together with a copy of the original complaint;

(iii) Each respondent may file, not later than ten days after receipt of notice from the commission, an answer to the complaint; and

(iv) Unless it is impracticable to do so, the commission shall investigate the alleged discriminatory housing practice and complete such investigation within one hundred days after the filing of the complaint or, when the commission takes further action under section 20-332 with respect to a complaint, within one hundred days after the commencement of such further action.

(c) If the commission is unable to complete the investigation within one hundred days after the filing of the complaint or after the commencement of such further action, the commission shall notify the complainant and respondent in writing of the reasons for not doing so.

(d) Complaints and answers shall be under oath and may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time.

(2)(a) A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint but who is identified as a respondent in the course of investigation may be joined as an additional or substitute respondent upon written notice under subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section to such person from the commission.

(b) The notice shall explain the basis for the commission's belief that the person to whom the notice is addressed is properly joined as a respondent.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 27;

Laws 2004, LB 625, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 26.